Illinois, session 104th, HB1843.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-13-1 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-13-1)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-13-1)7    Sec. 11-13-1. Zoning powers. 8    (a) To the end that adequate light, pure air, and safety 9from fire and other dangers may be secured, that the taxable 10value of land and buildings throughout the municipality may be 11conserved, that congestion in the public streets may be 12lessened or avoided, that the hazards to persons and damage to 13property resulting from the accumulation or runoff of storm or 14flood waters may be lessened or avoided, and that the public 15health, safety, comfort, morals, and welfare may otherwise be 16promoted, and to insure and facilitate the preservation of 17sites, areas, and structures of historical, architectural and 18aesthetic importance; the corporate authorities in each 19municipality have the following powers:20        (1) to regulate and limit the height and bulk of 21    buildings hereafter to be erected;22        (2) to establish, regulate and limit, subject to the 23    provisions of Division 14 of this Article 11, the building   HB1843 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1    or set-back lines on or along any street, traffic-way, 2    drive, parkway or storm or floodwater runoff channel or 3    basin;4        (3) to regulate and limit the intensity of the use of 5    lot areas, and to regulate and determine the area of open 6    spaces, within and surrounding such buildings;7        (4) to classify, regulate, and restrict the location 8    of trades and industries and the location of buildings 9    designed for specified industrial, business, residential, 10    and other uses;11        (5) to divide the entire municipality into districts 12    of such number, shape, area, and of such different classes 13    (according to use of land and buildings, height and bulk 14    of buildings, intensity of the use of lot area, area of 15    open spaces, or other classification) as may be deemed 16    best suited to carry out the purposes of this Division 13;17        (6) to fix standards to which buildings or structures 18    therein shall conform;19        (7) to prohibit uses, buildings, or structures 20    incompatible with the character of such districts;21        (8) to prevent additions to and alteration or 22    remodeling of existing buildings or structures in such a 23    way as to avoid the restrictions and limitations lawfully 24    imposed under this Division 13;25        (9) except as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection 26    (c), to classify, to regulate, and restrict the use of   HB1843 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1    property on the basis of family relationship, which family 2    relationship may be defined as one or more persons each 3    related to the other by blood, marriage or adoption and 4    maintaining a common household;5        (10) to regulate or forbid any structure or activity 6    which may hinder access to solar energy necessary for the 7    proper functioning of a solar energy system, as defined in 8    Section 1.2 of the Comprehensive Solar Energy Act of 1977;9        (11) to require the creation and preservation of 10    affordable housing, including the power to provide 11    increased density or other zoning incentives to developers 12    who are creating, establishing, or preserving affordable 13    housing; and14        (12) to establish local standards solely for the 15    review of the exterior design of buildings and structures, 16    excluding utility facilities and outdoor off-premises 17    advertising signs, and designate a board or commission to 18    implement the review process; except that, other than 19    reasonable restrictions as to size, no home rule or 20    non-home rule municipality may prohibit the display of 21    outdoor political campaign signs on residential property 22    during any period of time, the regulation of these signs 23    being a power and function of the State and, therefor, 24    this item (12) is a denial and limitation of concurrent 25    home rule powers and functions under subsection (i) of 26    Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution.  HB1843 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1    (b) The powers enumerated in this Section may not be used 2in any way that violates or otherwise contradicts any other 3applicable State or federal law, including the federal Fair 4Housing Act and the Americans with Disabilities Act.5    (c) A municipality may not adopt zoning regulations that 6prohibit:7        (1) the creation of a community-integrated living 8    arrangement or housing for a community-integrated living 9    arrangement; or10        (2) notwithstanding paragraph (9) of subsection (a), 2 11    or more individuals, who are not related by blood, from 12    living together in a community-integrated living 13    arrangement or housing for a community-integrated living 14    arrangement. 15    (d) The powers enumerated may be exercised within the 16corporate limits or within contiguous territory not more than 17one and one-half miles beyond the corporate limits and not 18included within any municipality. However, if any municipality 19adopts a plan pursuant to Division 12 of Article 11 which plan 20includes in its provisions a provision that the plan applies 21to such contiguous territory not more than one and one-half 22miles beyond the corporate limits and not included in any 23municipality, then no other municipality shall adopt a plan 24that shall apply to any territory included within the 25territory provided in the plan first so adopted by another 26municipality. No municipality shall exercise any power set   HB1843 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1forth in this Division 13 outside the corporate limits 2thereof, if the county in which such municipality is situated 3has adopted "An Act in relation to county zoning", approved 4June 12, 1935, as amended. Nothing in this Section prevents a 5municipality of more than 112,000 population located in a 6county of less than 185,000 population that has adopted a 7zoning ordinance and the county that adopted the zoning 8ordinance from entering into an intergovernmental agreement 9that allows the municipality to exercise its zoning powers 10beyond its territorial limits; provided, however, that the 11intergovernmental agreement must be limited to the territory 12within the municipality's planning jurisdiction as defined by 13law or any existing boundary agreement. The county and the 14municipality must amend their individual zoning maps in the 15same manner as other zoning changes are incorporated into 16revised zoning maps. No such intergovernmental agreement may 17authorize a municipality to exercise its zoning powers, other 18than powers that a county may exercise under Section 5-12001 19of the Counties Code, with respect to land used for 20agricultural purposes. This amendatory Act of the 92nd General 21Assembly is declarative of existing law. No municipality may 22exercise any power set forth in this Division 13 outside the 23corporate limits of the municipality with respect to a 24facility of a telecommunications carrier defined in Section 255-12001.1 of the Counties Code. 26    (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the   HB1843 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1contrary, 30 days prior to the issuance of any permits for a 2new telecommunications facility within 1.5 miles of a 3municipality, the telecommunications carrier constructing the 4facility shall provide written notice of its intent to 5construct the facility. The notice shall include, but not be 6limited to, the following information: (i) the name, address, 7and telephone number of the company responsible for the 8construction of the facility, (ii) the address and telephone 9number of the governmental entity that is to issue the 10building permit for the telecommunications facility, (iii) a 11site plan and site map of sufficient specificity to indicate 12both the location of the parcel where the telecommunications 13facility is to be constructed and the location of all the 14telecommunications facilities within that parcel, and (iv) the 15property index number and common address of the parcel where 16the telecommunications facility is to be located. The notice 17shall not contain any material that appears to be an 18advertisement for the telecommunications carrier or any 19services provided by the telecommunications carrier. The 20notice shall be provided in person, by overnight private 21courier, or by certified mail to all owners of property within 22250 feet of the parcel in which the telecommunications carrier 23has a leasehold or ownership interest. For the purposes of 24this notice requirement, "owners" means those persons or 25entities identified from the authentic tax records of the 26county in which the telecommunications facility is to be   HB1843 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1located. If, after a bona fide effort by the 2telecommunications carrier to determine the owner and his or 3her address, the owner of the property on whom the notice must 4be served cannot be found at the owner's last known address, or 5if the mailed notice is returned because the owner cannot be 6found at the last known address, the notice requirement of 7this paragraph is deemed satisfied. For the purposes of this 8paragraph, "facility" means that term as it is defined in 9Section 5-12001.1 of the Counties Code.10    (f) If a municipality adopts a zoning plan covering an 11area outside its corporate limits, the plan adopted shall be 12reasonable with respect to the area outside the corporate 13limits so that future development will not be hindered or 14impaired; it is reasonable for a municipality to regulate or 15prohibit the extraction of sand, gravel, or limestone even 16when those activities are related to an agricultural purpose. 17If all or any part of the area outside the corporate limits of 18a municipality which has been zoned in accordance with the 19provisions of this Division 13 is annexed to another 20municipality or municipalities, the annexing unit shall 21thereafter exercise all zoning powers and regulations over the 22annexed area.23    (g) In all ordinances passed under the authority of this 24Division 13, due allowance shall be made for existing 25conditions, the conservation of property values, the direction 26of building development to the best advantage of the entire   HB1843 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1municipality and the uses to which the property is devoted at 2the time of the enactment of such an ordinance. The powers 3conferred by this Division 13 shall not be exercised so as to 4deprive the owner of any existing property of its use or 5maintenance for the purpose to which it is then lawfully 6devoted, but provisions may be made for the gradual 7elimination of uses, buildings and structures which are 8incompatible with the character of the districts in which they 9are made or located, including, without being limited thereto, 10provisions (a) for the elimination of such uses of unimproved 11lands or lot areas when the existing rights of the persons in 12possession thereof are terminated or when the uses to which 13they are devoted are discontinued; (b) for the elimination of 14uses to which such buildings and structures are devoted, if 15they are adaptable for permitted uses; and (c) for the 16elimination of such buildings and structures when they are 17destroyed or damaged in major part, or when they have reached 18the age fixed by the corporate authorities of the municipality 19as the normal useful life of such buildings or structures.20    (h) This Section amendatory Act of 1971 does not apply to 21any municipality which is a home rule unit, except that 22subsections (b) and (c) and paragraph (12) of subsection (a) 23apply to home rule municipalities as provided in item (12). A 24home rule unit may not exercise the zoning and other powers 25described in subsections (b) and (c) and paragraph (12) of 26subsection (a) in a manner that is inconsistent with the   HB1843 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 11318 RTM 21404 b1regulation by the State of those powers under those 2provisions. This subsection (h) is a limitation under 3subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 4Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home rule units of 5powers and functions exercised by the State. 6(Source: P.A. 96-904, eff. 1-1-11; 97-496, eff. 8-22-11.)